Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1379.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9542 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 9542. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter provides for an action by which persons convicted of crimes they did not commit and persons serving illegal sentences may obtain collateral relief. This subchapter also provides for an action by which certain survivors of domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking may obtain postconviction resentencing relief. The action 12345678910111213141516171819202122 established in this subchapter shall be the sole means of obtaining collateral relief and encompasses all other common law and statutory remedies for the same purpose that exist when this subchapter takes effect, including habeas corpus and coram nobis. This subchapter is not intended to limit the availability of remedies in the trial court or on direct appeal from the judgment of sentence, to provide a means for raising issues waived in prior proceedings or to provide relief from collateral consequences of a criminal conviction. Except as specifically provided otherwise, all provisions of this subchapter shall apply to capital and noncapital cases.Section 2. Section 9543(a)(2) of Title 42 is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 9543. Eligibility for relief.(a) General rule.--To be eligible for relief under this subchapter, the petitioner must plead and prove by a preponderance of the evidence all of the following:* * *(2) That the conviction or sentence resulted from one or more of the following:* * *(ix) In the case of a petition under section 9543.2 (relating to postconviction resentencing relief for defendant survivors of domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking) , the petitioner's victimization was a significant contributing factor to the petitioner's criminal conduct. * * *Section 3. Title 42 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9543.2. Postconviction resentencing relief for defendant 20260SB1379PN1815 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 survivors of domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking.(a) Petition.--A petitioner convicted of a criminal offense in a court of this Commonwealth who is serving a term of imprisonment or awaiting execution because of a sentence of death may petition the sentencing court for postconviction resentencing relief under this section if the petitioner proves all of the following:(1) The petitioner was a survivor of domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking.(2) The petitioner's victimization was a significant contributing factor to the petitioner's criminal conduct.(b) Filing.--A petition under this section shall be filed in the court of common pleas in which the petitioner was convicted.(c) Contents of petition.--A petition under this section shall include all of the following:(1) The grounds for relief.(2) A statement of the facts supporting the grounds for relief.(3) Documentation showing that the petitioner is either:(i) currently serving a sentence of imprisonment; or(ii) awaiting execution of a sentence of death.(4) Evidence supporting the petitioner's claim that the petitioner was a survivor of domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking.(5) Evidence demonstrating that the petitioner's victimization was a significant contributing factor to the petitioner's criminal conduct.(6) In a capital case, an averment that the petitioner's status as a survivor under this section establishes a 20260SB1379PN1815 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mitigating circumstance.(d) Corroborating evidence.--(1) The petitioner shall provide at least one piece of evidence corroborating that the petitioner was a survivor at the time of the offense. A criminal conviction of a perpetrator shall not be required to establish survivor status.(2) At least one piece of corroborating evidence under paragraph (1) shall consist of any of the following:(i) A court record.(ii) A presentence report.(iii) A social services record.(iv) A hospital or medical record.(v) A sworn statement from a witness other than the petitioner.(vi) A law enforcement record.(vii) A domestic incident report.(viii) A protective order.(3) Additional corroborating evidence may include any of the following:(i) A county jail record or a Department of Corrections record.(ii) Verification of consultation with a licensed medical or mental health provider.(iii) Documentation from a court employee acting within the scope of employment.(iv) Documentation from a member of the clergy.(v) Documentation from an attorney or social worker.(vi) Documentation from a victim advocate or counselor.20260SB1379PN1815 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) Documentation from an agency that assists victims of abuse.(viii) Expert testimony from a psychiatrist, psychologist or other mental health professional, including testimony regarding trauma, coercive control or post-traumatic stress disorder.(e) Notice to Commonwealth.--Upon receipt of a petition under subsection (a), the court shall notify the attorney for the Commonwealth and shall afford the attorney for the Commonwealth an opportunity to respond.(f) Hearing.--(1) After the filing of a petition under this section, the court shall review the petition, any answer filed by the attorney for the Commonwealth and the record in the matter. The court shall conduct a hearing if the petition complies with subsections (c) and (d). If the court finds that the petition does not comply with subsections (c) and (d), the court shall notify the petitioner and deny the petition without prejudice.(2) If the judge who imposed the original sentence is no longer serving on the court, the petition shall be assigned in accordance with rules of court.(3) The court shall provide notice of the hearing to the petitioner, the attorney for the Commonwealth and any victim entitled to notice under law. The notice shall specify the date, time and place of the hearing.(4) At the hearing, the court shall have the following duties:(i) Receive testimony from witnesses presented by either party.20260SB1379PN1815 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Receive victim testimony, if applicable.(iii) Admit and consider other relevant evidence, including documentary evidence and expert testimony, necessary to determine whether the petitioner was a survivor of domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking and whether the petitioner's victimization was a significant contributing factor to the petitioner's criminal conduct.(5) In determining whether the petitioner's victimization was a significant contributing factor to the petitioner's criminal conduct, the court may consider expert testimony and evidence of trauma, coercive control or post-traumatic stress disorder.(6) The court may determine that the petitioner's victimization was a significant contributing factor to the petitioner's criminal conduct regardless of whether the petitioner raised an affirmative defense at trial or at the time of the offense.(g) Burden of proof.--The petitioner has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner qualifies for relief under this section.(h) Nonwaiver.--The right of a petitioner to seek relief under this section may not be waived. A waiver of the right to seek relief under this section, including a waiver in a plea agreement, sentencing agreement or other agreement, shall be void and unenforceable.(i) Findings and statement of reasons.--(1) If the court denies relief under this section, the court shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law on the record and state in open court the reasons for the 20260SB1379PN1815 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 denial. The statement must include the court's determination regarding the petitioner's eligibility under this section.(2) If the court grants relief under this section, the court shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law on the record and state in open court the reasons for the sentence imposed. The statement must include the court's determination regarding the petitioner's eligibility under this section and the extent to which the petitioner's victimization was a significant contributing factor to the petitioner's criminal conduct . (j) Resentencing order.--If the court finds that the petitioner has established eligibility for relief under this section, the court may vacate the original sentence and resentence the petitioner in accordance with subsection (k) or impose any of the following:(1) A sentence below the minimum sentence specified in the sentencing guidelines adopted by the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing.(2) A sentence that does not include incarceration.(k) Sentencing limitations.--(1) If the court grants relief under this section, the court may not impose a sentence greater than any of the following:(i) If the original sentence was life imprisonment without parole, a term of not more than 25 years.(ii) If the original sentence was life imprisonment with parole, a term of not more than 20 years.(iii) If the original sentence was 30 years or more, a term of not more than 15 years.(iv) If the original sentence was 20 years or more, 20260SB1379PN1815 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a term of not more than 10 years.(v) If the original sentence was 15 years or more, a term of not more than seven and one-half years.(vi) If the original sentence was eight years or more, a term of not more than four years.(vii) If the original sentence was at least five years but less than eight years, a term of not more than two and one-half years.(viii) If the original sentence was less than five years, a term of not more than 50% of the original sentence imposed.(2) Sentencing guidelines adopted by the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing may not supersede the sentencing limitations under paragraph (1).(l) Credit for time served.--A person who is resentenced under this section shall be given credit for time served toward the sentence originally imposed. A person whose time served exceeds the period of incarceration required by the reduced sentence shall be released.(m) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Survivor." A defendant who was a victim of domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking and was subjected to significant physical, sexual or psychological abuse."Victimization." Domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking experienced by a survivor at the time of the offense.Section 4. Sections 9545(b) and 9711(e) of Title 42 are amended by adding paragraphs to read:20260SB1379PN1815 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 9545. Jurisdiction and proceedings.* * *(b) Time for filing petition.--* * *(2.1) A petition under section 9543.2 (relating to p ostconviction resentencing relief for defendant survivors of domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking) shall not be subject to the time limitation under paragraph (1).* * *§ 9711. Sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree.* * *(e) Mitigating circumstances.--Mitigating circumstances shall include the following:* * *(7.1) The defendant was a survivor as defined in section 9730.4(f) (relating to criminal prosecutions involving defendant survivors of domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking) . * * *Section 5. Title 42 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9730.4. Criminal prosecutions involving defendant survivors of domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking.(a) Consideration by court.--In imposing a sentence for an offense committed by a defendant who is a survivor, the court shall consider evidence that the defendant was a survivor of domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking and that the defendant's victimization was a significant contributing factor to the defendant's criminal conduct.20260SB1379PN1815 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Mitigating factor.--If the court finds that the defendant's victimization was a significant contributing factor to the defendant's criminal conduct, the court shall consider that finding as a mitigating factor in determining the appropriate sentence and may impose any of the following:(1) A sentence below the minimum sentence specified in the sentencing guidelines adopted by the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing.(2) A sentence that does not include incarceration.(c) Limitation.--(1) The court may not impose a sentence under this section greater than any of the following:(i) If the maximum sentence is life imprisonment without parole, a term of not more than 25 years.(ii) If the maximum sentence is life imprisonment with parole, a term of not more than 20 years.(iii) If the maximum sentence is 30 years or more, a term of not more than 15 years.(iv) If the maximum sentence is 20 years or more, a term of not more than 10 years.(v) If the maximum sentence is 15 years or more, a term of not more than seven and one-half years.(vi) If the maximum sentence is eight years or more, a term of not more than four years.(vii) If the maximum sentence is at least five years but less than eight years, a term of not more than two and one-half years.(viii) If the maximum sentence is less than five years, a term of not more than 50% of the original sentence imposed.20260SB1379PN1815 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Sentencing guidelines adopted by the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing may not supersede the sentencing limitations under paragraph (1).(d) Credit for time served.--A person who is sentenced under this section shall be given credit for time served as provided under section 9760 (relating to credit for time served).(e) Nonwaiver.--The right of a defendant to present evidence and request consideration under this section may not be waived. A waiver of the right to present evidence or request consideration under this section, including a waiver in a plea agreement, sentencing agreement or other agreement, shall be void and unenforceable.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Survivor." A defendant who, at the time of the offense, was a victim of domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking and was subjected to significant physical, sexual or psychological abuse."Victimization." Domestic violence, sexual violence or human trafficking experienced by a survivor at the time of the offense.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1379PN1815 - 11 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223